District of Columbia statutes.
31-4716.01

Exemption from legal process — Disability benefits.

No money or other benefit paid, provided, allowed, or agreed to be paid by any company on account of the disability from injury or sickness of any insured person shall be liable to execution, attachment, garnishment, or other process, or to be seized, taken, appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law, to pay any debt or liability of such insured person whether such debt or liability was incurred before or after the commencement of such disability, but the provisions of this section shall not affect the assignability of any such disability benefit otherwise assignable, nor shall this section apply to any money income disability benefit in an action to recover for necessaries contracted for after the commencement of disability covered by the disability clause or contract allowing such money income benefit.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1175, ch. 672, ch. V, § 16a
1981 Ed., § 35-522.
1973 Ed., § 35-717.